Maine, session 132, LD1742.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §60 is enacted to read:
§60. Restricting social media platform user from commenting on state-shared content
prohibited
The account holder or the administrator of a social media platform account of a state,
county or municipal department, agency, board or commission or a state, county or
municipal official operating in that individual's official capacity may not restrict a user of
that social media platform from commenting on content shared by the account holder or
the administrator of the social media platform account if the social media platform allows
a user to comment on content shared on the platform.
This section may not be construed to prevent a social media platform from adopting or
enforcing rules related to the type of content or the removal of certain content shared on
that social media platform.
For purposes of this section, "social media platform" means a publicly accessible
website or electronic medium that permits a person to become a registered user, establish
an account or create a profile for the purpose of allowing users to create, share and view
user-generated content.